Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB530.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of accessory equipment, communications equipment or protective equipment when purchased by a paid or volunteer firefighter or a member of the special 12345678910111213141516171819202122 fire police who uses personal funds and, at the time of purchase, provides identification showing the individual's status as a firefighter or a member of the special fire police . The exclusion under this clause shall be included on any sales tax exclusion list made available to retailers and shall not apply if the cost of the accessory equipment, communications equipment or protective equipment is paid by the firefighter's fire company , the member's special fire police unit or any other entity. For purposes of this clause, the following terms or phrases shall have the following meanings:(i) "Accessory equipment" means firefighting, ambulance and rescue equipment necessary to carry out the ordinary functions of supporting fire, life and rescue activities.(ii) "Communications equipment" means a voice or original transmission system required to support the operation of a volunteer fire company, volunteer ambulance service and volunteer rescue squad or a special fire police unit. (iii) "Protective equipment" means equipment used by firefighters, members of a special fire police unit, volunteer ambulance service personnel or volunteer rescue service personnel to protect their person from injury while performing functions, including, but not limited to, helmets, turnout coats and pants, boots, eye shields, gloves and self-contained respiratory protection units . (iv) "Special fire police" means special fire police as specified under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 74 Subch. D (relating to special fire police).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0530PN0503 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728